Idaho, session 2026, H0676.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 42-202, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
42-202. APPLICATION TO APPROPRIATE WATER -- CONTENTS -- FILING FEES --
DISPOSITION OF FEES -- RECORD OF RECEIPTS. (1) For the purpose of regulat-
ing the use of the public waters and of establishing by direct means the pri-
ority right to such use, any person, association or corporation hereafter
intending to acquire the right to the beneficial use of the waters of any
natural streams, springs or seepage waters, lakes or ground water, or other
public waters in the state of Idaho, shall, before commencing of the con-
struction, enlargement or extension of the ditch, canal, well, or other dis-
tributing works, or performing any work in connection with said construction
or proposed appropriation or the diversion of any waters into a natural chan-
nel, make an application to the department of water resources for a permit
to make such appropriation. Provided however, if the use of the diversion
works or irrigation system is represented by shares of stock in a corporation
or if such works or system is owned or managed by an irrigation district, no
such application may be approved by the director of the department of water
resources without the consent of such corporation or irrigation district.
Such application must set forth:
(a) The name and post-office address of the applicant.
(b) The source of the water supply.
(c) The nature of the proposed use or uses and the period of the year
during which water is to be used for such use or uses.
(d) The location of the point of diversion and description of the pro-
posed ditch, channel, well or other work and the amount of water to be
diverted and used.
(e) The time required for the completion of construction of such works
and application of the water to the proposed use.
(2) An application proposing an appropriation of water by a municipal
provider for reasonably anticipated future needs shall be accompanied by
sufficient information and documentation to establish that the applicant
qualifies as a municipal provider and that the reasonably anticipated fu-
ture needs, the service area, and the planning horizon are consistent with
the definitions and requirements specified in this chapter. The service
area need not be described by legal description nor by description of every


intended use in detail, but the area must be described with sufficient in-
formation to identify the general location where the water under the water
right is to be used and the types and quantity of uses that generally will
be made. An application for reasonably anticipated future needs for or in-
cluding geothermal heating and cooling shall include sufficient information
and documentation to demonstrate where and how injection of the diverted low
temperature geothermal water is or will be accomplished.
(3) Whenever it is desired to appropriate and store flood or winterflow
waters, the applicant shall specify in acre feet the quantity of such flood
or winterflow waters which he intends to store, but for irrigation purposes
he shall not claim more than five (5) acre feet of stored water per acre of
land to be irrigated, nor, in the event of the filing of an application claim-
ing both normal flow and flood water and winterflow water, shall the total
amount of water claimed exceed the equivalent of a continuous flow during the
irrigation season of more than one (1) cubic foot per second for each fifty
(50) acres of land to be irrigated, or more than five (5) acre feet of stored
water for each acre of land to be irrigated.
(4) The application shall be accompanied by a plan and map of the pro-
posed works for the diversion and application of the water to a beneficial
use, showing the character, location and dimensions of the proposed reser-
voirs, dams, canals, ditches, pipelines, wells and all other works proposed
to be used by them in the diversion of the water, and the area and location of
the lands proposed to be irrigated, or location of place of other use.
(5) If the application involves more than twenty-five (25) cubic feet
per second of water or the development of more than five hundred (500) the-
oretical horsepower, or impoundment of water in a reservoir with an active
storage capacity in excess of ten thousand (10,000) acre feet, the applicant
may be required by the director of the department of water resources to fur-
nish a statement of the financial resources of the corporation, association,
firm or person making the application, and the means by which the funds nec-
essary to construct the proposed works are to be provided, and the estimated
cost of construction; and if such application is made by a corporation, the
amount of its capital stock, how much thereof has been actually paid in, and
the names and places of residence of its directors; and if for the generation
of power or any other purpose than irrigation or domestic use, the purpose
for which it is proposed to be used, the nature, location, character, capac-
ity and estimated cost of the works, and whether the water used is to be and
will be returned to the stream, and if so, at what point on the stream.
(6) In case the proposed right of use is for agricultural purposes, the
application shall give the legal subdivisions of the land proposed to be ir-
rigated, with the total acreage to be reclaimed as near as may be; provided,
that no one shall be authorized to divert for irrigation purposes more than
one (1) cubic foot of water per second of the normal flow for each fifty (50)
acres of land to be so irrigated, or more than five (5) acre feet of stored
water per annum for each acre of land to be so irrigated, unless it can be
shown to the satisfaction of the department of water resources that a greater
amount is necessary. Provided further, that the plan of irrigation submit-
ted shall provide for the distribution of water to within not more than one
(1) mile of each legal subdivision of the land proposed to be reclaimed by the
use of such water; provided also, that in the case of all ditches designed to


have a capacity of ten (10) cubic feet per second or less, such map showing
the location of such ditch, and the place of use of such water, or the loca-
tion of the lands to be irrigated, may be upon blanks furnished by the depart-
ment of water resources.
(7) No application shall be accepted and filed by the department of wa-
ter resources until the applicant shall have deposited with the department a
filing fee as in this chapter provided.
(8) All moneys received by the department of water resources under the
provisions of this chapter shall be deposited with the state treasurer, and
such sums as may be necessary shall be available for the payment of the ex-
penses of the department of water resources incurred in carrying out the pro-
visions of this chapter.
(9) Such expense shall be paid by the state controller in the manner
provided by law, upon vouchers duly approved by the state board of examin-
ers, for the work performed under the direction of the department of water
resources. The department of water resources shall keep a record of all fil-
ing fees received in connection with applications for permits to appropriate
public waters.
(10) Provided further, that rights initiated prior to the enactment of
this amendment, so far as it pertains to flood and winterflow waters, shall
not be affected thereby.
(11) Provided further, that water rights held by municipal providers
prior to July 1, 1996, shall not be limited thereby.
SECTION 2. That Section 42-202B, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
42-202B. DEFINITIONS. Whenever used in this title, the term:
(1) "Consumptive use" means that portion of the annual volume of water
diverted under a water right that is transpired by growing vegetation, evap-
orated from soils, converted to nonrecoverable water vapor, incorporated
into products, or otherwise does not return to the waters of the state. Con-
sumptive use is not an element of a water right. Consumptive use does not
include any water that falls as precipitation directly on the place of use.
Precipitation shall not be considered to reduce the consumptive use of a
water right. "Authorized consumptive use" means the maximum consumptive use
that may be made of a water right. If the use of a water right is for irriga-
tion, for example, the authorized consumptive use reflects irrigation of the
most consumptive vegetation that may be grown at the place of use. Changes in
consumptive use do not require a transfer pursuant to section 42-222, Idaho
Code.
(2) "Digital boundary" means the boundary encompassing and defining an
area consisting of or incorporating the place of use or permissible place of
use for a water right prepared and maintained by the department of water re-
sources using a geographic information system in conformance with the na-
tional standard for spatial data accuracy or succeeding standard.
(3) "Local public interest" is defined as the interests that the people
in the area directly affected by a proposed water use have in the effects of
such use on the public water resource.


(4) "Municipality" means a city incorporated under section 50-102,
Idaho Code, a county, or the state of Idaho acting through a department or
institution.
(5) "Municipal provider" means:
(a) A municipality that provides water for municipal purposes to its
residents and other users within its service area;
(b) Any corporation or association holding a franchise to supply water
for municipal purposes, or a political subdivision of the state of Idaho
authorized to supply water for municipal purposes, and which does sup-
ply water, for municipal purposes to users within its service area; or
(c) A corporation or association which supplies water for municipal
purposes through a water system regulated by the state of Idaho as a
"public water supply" as described in section 39-103(12), Idaho Code.
(6)(a) "Municipal purposes" refers to water for residential, com-
mercial, industrial, irrigation of parks and open space, and related
purposes, excluding use of water from geothermal sources for heating,
which that a municipal provider is entitled or obligated to supply to
all those users within a service area, including those located outside
the boundaries of a municipality served by a municipal provider, for
residential use, commercial use, industrial use, irrigation of parks
and open spaces, geothermal heating and cooling, and related purposes,
or a combination thereof.
(b)(i) Geothermal heating and cooling are considered "municipal
purposes" if:
1. It is provided by a municipality from a low temperature
geothermal water source, as that term is defined in section
42-230(a)(1), Idaho Code;
2. The water use is non-consumptive under normal operating
conditions; and
3. The use otherwise complies with section 42-233, Idaho
Code.
(ii) A municipality is obligated to supply geothermal heating and
cooling only to those users approved for service in accordance
with its local codes and policies.
(7) "Planning horizon" refers to the length of time that the department
determines is reasonable for a municipal provider to hold water rights to
meet reasonably anticipated future needs. The length of the planning hori-
zon may vary according to the needs of the particular municipal provider.
(8) "Reasonably anticipated future needs" refers to future uses of
water by a municipal provider for municipal purposes within a service area
which, on the basis of population and other planning data, are reasonably
expected to be required within the planning horizon of each municipality
within the service area not inconsistent with comprehensive land use plans
approved by each municipality. Reasonably anticipated future needs shall
not include uses of water within areas overlapped by conflicting comprehen-
sive land use plans. Reasonably anticipated future needs for geothermal
heating and cooling require injection of diverted low temperature geother-
mal water back into the same aquifer from which it was diverted and shall be
considered when determining what needs will be expected within the planning
horizon.


(9) "Service area" means that area within which a municipal provider is
or becomes entitled or obligated to provide water for municipal purposes.
For a municipality, the service area shall correspond to its corporate lim-
its, or other recognized boundaries, including changes therein after the
permit or license is issued. The service area for a municipality may also
include areas outside its corporate limits, or other recognized boundaries,
that are within the municipality's established planning area if the con-
structed delivery system for the area shares a common water distribution
system with lands located within the corporate limits. For a municipal
provider that is not a municipality, the service area shall correspond to the
area that it is authorized or obligated to serve, including changes therein
after the permit or license is issued.
SECTION 3. That Section 42-222, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
42-222. CHANGE IN POINT OF DIVERSION, PLACE OF USE, PERIOD OF USE, OR
NATURE OF USE OF WATER UNDER ESTABLISHED RIGHTS -- FORFEITURE AND EXTENSION
-- APPEALS. (1) Any person, entitled to the use of water whether represented
by license issued by the department of water resources, by claims to water
rights by reason of diversion and application to a beneficial use as filed
under the provisions of this chapter, or by decree of the court, who shall
desire to change the point of diversion, place of use, period of use or na-
ture of use of all or part of the water, under the right shall first make ap-
plication to the department of water resources for approval of such change.
Such application shall be upon forms furnished by the department and shall
describe the right licensed, claimed or decreed which is to be changed and
the changes which are proposed, and shall be accompanied by the statutory
filing fee as in this chapter provided. Upon receipt of such application it
shall be the duty of the director of the department of water resources to ex-
amine same, obtain any consent required in section 42-108, Idaho Code, and if
otherwise proper to provide notice of the proposed change in a similar man-
ner as applications under section 42-203A, Idaho Code. Such notice shall ad-
vise that anyone who desires to protest the proposed change shall file no-
tice of protests with the department within ten (10) days of the last date
of publication. Upon the receipt of any protest, accompanied by the statu-
tory filing fee as provided in section 42-221, Idaho Code, it shall be the
duty of the director of the department of water resources to investigate the
same and to conduct a hearing thereon. He shall also advise the watermaster
of the district in which such water is used of the proposed change and the wa-
termaster shall notify the director of the department of water resources of
his recommendation on the application, and the director of the department
of water resources shall not finally determine the action on the applica-
tion for change until he has received from such watermaster his recommenda-
tion thereof, which action of the watermaster shall be received and consid-
ered as other evidence. For applications proposing to change only the point
of diversion or place of use of a water right in a manner that will not change
the effect on the source for the right and any other hydraulically-connected
sources from the effect resulting under the right as previously approved,
and that will not affect the rights of other water users, the director of the


department of water resources shall give only such notice to other users as
he deems appropriate.
When the nature of use of the water right is to be changed to municipal
purposes and some or all of the right will be held by a municipal provider
to serve reasonably anticipated future needs, the municipal provider shall
provide to the department sufficient information and documentation to es-
tablish that the applicant qualifies as a municipal provider and that the
reasonably anticipated future needs, the service area and the planning hori-
zon are consistent with the definitions and requirements specified in this
chapter. The service area need not be described by legal description nor by
description of every intended use in detail, but the area must be described
with sufficient information to identify the general location where the wa-
ter under the water right is to be used and the types and quantity of uses that
generally will be made. An application for reasonably anticipated future
needs for or including geothermal heating and cooling shall include suffi-
cient information and documentation to demonstrate where and how injection
of the diverted low temperature geothermal water is or will be accomplished.
When a water right or a portion thereof to be changed is held by a munic-
ipal provider for municipal purposes, as defined in section 42-202B, Idaho
Code, that portion of the right held for reasonably anticipated future needs
at the time of the change shall not be changed to a place of use outside the
service area, as defined in section 42-202B, Idaho Code, or to a new nature of
use.
The director of the department of water resources shall examine all the
evidence and available information and shall approve the change in whole,
or in part, or upon conditions, provided no other water rights are injured
thereby, the change does not constitute an enlargement in use of the origi-
nal right, the change is consistent with the conservation of water resources
within the state of Idaho and is in the local public interest as defined in
section 42-202B, Idaho Code, the change will not adversely affect the local
economy of the watershed or local area within which the source of water for
the proposed use originates, in the case where the place of use is outside
of the watershed or local area where the source of water originates, and the
new use is a beneficial use, which in the case of a municipal provider shall
be satisfied if the water right is necessary to serve reasonably anticipated
future needs as provided in this chapter. The director may consider consump-
tive use, as defined in section 42-202B, Idaho Code, as a factor in determin-
ing whether a proposed change would constitute an enlargement in use of the
original water right. The director shall not approve a change in the nature
of use from agricultural use where such change would significantly affect
the agricultural base of the local area. The transfer of the right to the use
of stored water for irrigation purposes shall not constitute an enlargement
in use of the original right even though more acres may be irrigated, if no
other water rights are injured thereby. A copy of the approved application
for change shall be returned to the applicant and he shall be authorized upon
receipt thereof to make the change and the original water right shall be pre-
sumed to have been amended by reason of such authorized change. In the event
the director of the department of water resources determines that a proposed
change shall not be approved as provided in this section, he shall deny the
same and forward notice of such action to the applicant by certified mail,


which decision shall be subject to judicial review as hereafter set forth.
Provided however, minimum stream flow water rights may not be established
under the local public interest criterion, and may only be established pur-
suant to chapter 15, title 42, Idaho Code.
(2) All rights to the use of water acquired under this chapter or other-
wise shall be lost and forfeited by a failure for the term of five (5) years
to apply it to the beneficial use for which it was appropriated and when any
right to the use of water shall be lost through nonuse or forfeiture such
rights to such water shall revert to the state and be again subject to appro-
priation under this chapter; except that any right to the use of water shall
not be lost through forfeiture by the failure to apply the water to benefi-
cial use under certain circumstances as specified in section 42-223, Idaho
Code. The party asserting that a water right has been forfeited has the bur-
den of proving the forfeiture by clear and convincing evidence.
(3) Upon proper showing before the director of the department of water
resources of good and sufficient reason for nonapplication to beneficial use
of such water for such term of five (5) years, the director of the department
of water resources is hereby authorized to grant an extension of time extend-
ing the time for forfeiture of title for nonuse thereof, to such waters for a
period of not to exceed five (5) additional years.
(4) Application for an extension shall be made before the end of the
five (5) year period upon forms to be furnished by the department of water re-
sources and shall fully describe the right on which an extension of time to
resume the use is requested and the reasons for such nonuse and shall be ac-
companied by the statutory filing fee; provided that water rights protected
from forfeiture under the provisions of section 42-223, Idaho Code, are ex-
empt from this requirement.
(a) Upon the receipt of such application it shall be the duty of the di-
rector of the department of water resources to examine the same and to
provide notice of the application for an extension in the same manner as
applications under section 42-203A, Idaho Code. The notice shall fully
describe the right, the extension which is requested and the reason for
such nonuse and shall state that any person desiring to object to the
requested extension may submit a protest, accompanied by the statutory
filing fee as provided in section 42-221, Idaho Code, to the director of
the department of water resources within ten (10) days of the last date
of publication.
(b) Upon receipt of a protest it shall be the duty of the director of
the department of water resources to investigate and conduct a hearing
thereon as in this chapter provided.
(c) The director of the department of water resources shall find from
the evidence presented in any hearing, or from information available to
the department, the reasons for such nonuse of water and where it ap-
pears to the satisfaction of the director of the department of water re-
sources that other rights will not be impaired by granting an extension
of time within which to resume the use of the water and good cause ap-
pearing for such nonuse, he may grant one (1) extension of five (5) years
within which to resume such use.
(d) In his approval of the application for an extension of time under
this section the director of the department of water resources shall set


the date when the use of water is to be resumed. Sixty (60) days before
such date the director of the department of water resources shall for-
ward to the applicant at his address of record a notice by certified mail
setting forth the date on which the use of water is to be resumed and a
form for reporting the resumption of the use of the water right. If the
use of the water has not been resumed and report thereon made on or be-
fore the date set for resumption of use such right shall revert to the
state and again be subject to appropriation, as provided in this sec-
tion.
(e) In the event the director of the department of water resources de-
termines that a proposed extension of time within which to resume use of
a water right shall not be approved as provided in this section, he shall
deny same and forward notice of such action to the applicant by certi-
fied mail, which decision shall be subject to judicial review as here-
after provided.
(5) Any person or persons feeling themselves aggrieved by the determi-
nation of the department of water resources in approving or rejecting an ap-
plication to change the point of diversion, place, period of use or nature
of use of water under an established right or an application for an exten-
sion of time within which to resume the use of water as provided in this sec-
tion, may, if a protest was filed and a hearing held thereon, seek judicial
review pursuant to section 42-1701A(4), Idaho Code. If no protest was filed
and no hearing held, the applicant may request a hearing pursuant to section
42-1701A(3), Idaho Code, for the purpose of contesting the action of the di-
rector and may seek judicial review of the final order of the director fol-
lowing the hearing pursuant to section 42-1701A(4), Idaho Code.
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.